District of Columbia statutes.
31-3003

Nondiscrimination.

No health insurer shall:

(1)

Require an insured to pay a higher deductible, copayment, or coinsurance; require a longer waiting period; or impose any other condition for coverage of any of the benefits set forth in this chapter other than is required for other benefits covered by the insured’s health benefit plan;

(2)

Refuse to issue a health benefit plan solely because an applicant may use any of the benefits covered by this chapter;

(3)

Cancel a health benefit plan solely because an insured has used any of the benefits covered by this chapter;

(4)

Offer to pay any type of material inducement or financial incentive to an insured to discourage the insured from using any of the benefits covered by this chapter; or

(5)

Offer to pay any type of financial or other material incentive to a health care provider to deny, reduce, withhold, limit, or delay to an insured any of the benefits covered by this chapter.

Oct. 21, 2000, D.C. Law 13-175, § 4, 47 DCR 6832

History